Washington statutes.
RCW 33.48.220

Recitation in permit to take subscriptions for stock.

Every permit to take subscriptions for stock shall recite in boldface type that the issuance thereof is permissive only and does not constitute a recommendation or endorsement of the stock permitted to be issued.

[ 1982 c 3 s 104; 1973 c 130 s 12.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.

Severability—1973 c 130: See note following RCW 33.24.350.